Hawaii statutes.
§201H-2 Hawaii housing finance and
development corporation; establishment, staff. (a) There is established
the Hawaii housing finance and development corporation to be placed within the
department of business, economic development, and tourism for administrative
purposes only. The corporation shall be a public body and a body corporate and
politic.

(b) The corporation shall employ, exempt from
chapter 76 and section 26-35(a)(4), an executive director and an executive
assistant. The executive director shall be paid a salary not to exceed the
salary of the director of business, economic development, and tourism. The
executive assistant shall be paid a salary not to exceed ninety per cent of the
executive director's salary. The corporation may employ, subject to chapter
76, technical experts and officers, agents, and employees, permanent and
temporary, as required. The corporation may also employ officers, agents, and
employees, prescribe their duties and qualifications, and fix their salaries,
not subject to chapter 76, when in the determination of the corporation, the
services to be performed are unique and essential to the execution of the
functions of the corporation. The corporation may call upon the attorney
general for legal services as it may require. The corporation may delegate to
one or more of its agents or employees its powers and duties as it deems
proper.

(c) The board shall submit a report to the
legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular
session immediately following each adjustment of salary of the executive
director. [L 2005, c 196, pt of §20; am L 2006, c 180, §7; am l 2016, c 91, §1]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next